District of Columbia statutes.
9-101.08

Reversion of title upon abandonment of streets.

Upon the abandonment of any street, avenue, road, or highway, or part thereof, under the provisions of §§ 9-103.01 to 9-103.05, the title to the land contained in such abandoned portion shall revert to the owners of the land abutting thereon.

Feb. 16, 1904, 33 Stat. 14, ch. 159, § 2
“ Section 9-103.05” has been repealed by § 711 of D.C. Law 4-201, effective March 10, 1983.
1973 Ed., § 7-118.
1981 Ed., § 7-118.
Street and alley closing and acquisition procedures, see § 9-201.01 et seq.